lexc/adj/enhuadjigem.lexc
LEXICON Possboeaejajeet
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l     #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Famboe;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Famboe;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§JJ§§AE1§   Famboe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§Jnull§§AE1§   Famboe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famboe;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Famboe;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE1§k   Famboe;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Famboe;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE§im   Famboe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE§id   Famboe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE§i   Famboe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE§ink   Famboe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famboe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE§ik   Famboe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Famboe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Famboe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Famboe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Famboe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famboe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Famboe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famboe;

LEXICON AddAdjboeet
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1boe;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseboeet;

Lexicon Tocaseboeet
[stem]+Adj:0     Possboeet;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurboe;
[stem]+Adj:0     Famboe;

LEXICON Possboeet
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l     #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Famboe;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Famboe;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Famboe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famboe;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Famboe;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famboe;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famboe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famboe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famboe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famboe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famboe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famboe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famboe;

LEXICON AddAdjboeo
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1boe;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseboeo;

Lexicon Tocaseboeo
[stem]+Adj:0     Possboe;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurboeo;
[stem]+Adj:0     Famboe;

LEXICON Plurboeo
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genboe; ! oeö
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genboe; !aeö
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoe§k    Genboe2; !ae magánhangzó után is
                       Genboe;

LEXICON AddAdjboeot
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1boe;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseboeot;



Lexicon Tocaseboeot
[stem]+Adj:0     Possboeot;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurboeot;
[stem]+Adj:0     Famboeot1;

LEXICON Possboeot
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l     #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§AE§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Famboeot;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Famboeot;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Famboeot;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famboeot;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Famboeot;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famboeot;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famboeot;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famboeot;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famboeot;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famboeot;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famboeot;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famboeot;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famboeot1;

LEXICON Plurboeot
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genboeot; 
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genboeot; 
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoe§k    Genboeot2; 
                       Genboeot;

LEXICON Famboeot
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genboeot;
                       Genboeot;
LEXICON Famboeot1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genboeot;
                       Genboeot1;

LEXICON Genboeot
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseboe;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseboe;
                       Caseboe;
LEXICON Genboeot1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseboe;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseboe;
                       Caseboeot1;

LEXICON Genboeot2
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseboe;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseboe;
                       Caseboe2;



LEXICON Caseboeot1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez4§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez4a§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoeza§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig


!result
!legeslegkedvesebbet
!legeslegkedvesebben
!legkedvesebbet
!legkedvesebben
!kedvesebbet
!kedvesebben
!kedveset
!kedvesen

LEXICON Adj
adóztathatatlan AddAdjboeo;
adóztatott AddAdjboeot;
akart AddAdjboeet;
akasztott AddAdjboeot;
aknázhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
alkalmazkodott AddAdjboeot;
alkudhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
anakronisztikusodott AddAdjboeot;
anyátlanodott AddAdjboeot;
aratós AddAdjboeet;
asszimilálhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
aszimmetrikusodott AddAdjboeot;
azonosíthatatlan AddAdjboeo;
bajuszosodott AddAdjboeot;
birtoklott AddAdjboeot;
blokkolhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
bocsátott AddAdjboeot;
bombázhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
bontakozott AddAdjboeot;
botránkozott AddAdjboeot;
bukhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
buszoztatott AddAdjboeot;
bátorodott AddAdjboeot;
bírálásos AddAdjboeet;
bízhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
búvott AddAdjboeot;
civilizálatlanodott AddAdjboeot;
csalt AddAdjboeet;
csapós AddAdjboeet;
csattogott AddAdjboeot;
csillapíthatatlan AddAdjboeo;
csorgott AddAdjboeot;
csukhatós AddAdjboeet;
cáfolhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
dagasztatott AddAdjboeot;
darabolós AddAdjboeet;
determinálhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
drótozott AddAdjboeot;
dumálhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
előzős AddAdjboeet;
eséses AddAdjboeet;
facsarodott AddAdjboeot;
facsarós AddAdjboeet;
fakulhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
fektetős AddAdjboeet;
fintorogott AddAdjboeot;
fizetős AddAdjboeet;
fogathatatlan AddAdjboeo;
fogzott AddAdjboeot;
foldozhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
folyásos AddAdjboeet;     
fordíthatatlan AddAdjboeo;     
forrasztott AddAdjboeot;
forrt AddAdjboeet;
fáradhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
fárasztatott AddAdjboeot;
fázásos AddAdjboeet;
fúvódásos AddAdjboeet;
gazdálkodhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
gondolhatatlanodott AddAdjboeot;
gyilkolhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
gyorsírt AddAdjboeet;
gyógyítatlanodott AddAdjboeot;
gyűrt AddAdjboeet;
gáncsolhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
habart AddAdjboeet;
hajtós AddAdjboeet;     
haladhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
hallatott AddAdjboeot;
hallhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
haraphatatlan AddAdjboeo;
hasonlíthatatlanodott AddAdjboeot;
hatolhatatlan AddAdjboeo;     
hatós AddAdjboeet;
hervaszthatatlan AddAdjboeo;
hintázott AddAdjboeot;
hosszabbíthatatlan AddAdjboeo;
humánusodott AddAdjboeot;
hunyt AddAdjboeet;
hántatlan AddAdjboeo;
hígítatlanodott AddAdjboeot;
hódíthatatlan AddAdjboeo;
hördüléses AddAdjboeet;
húzós AddAdjboeet;     
iktatatlan AddAdjboeo;
iktatós AddAdjboeet;
imbolyogott AddAdjboeot;
indíthatós AddAdjboeet;
inoghatatlan AddAdjboeo;
italozott AddAdjboeot;
itatós AddAdjboeet;
jelzálogosítatlan AddAdjboeo;
járt AddAdjboeet;
jóváhagyatott AddAdjboeot;
kapart AddAdjboeet;
kaphatatlan AddAdjboeo;
karistolódott AddAdjboeot;     
kelős AddAdjboeet;
kodifikálhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
kontrollálhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
kopogott AddAdjboeot;
koros AddAdjboeet;     
korrigálhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
kozmásodott AddAdjboeot;
kutatatlan AddAdjboeo;
kávézott AddAdjboeot;
kérdezéses AddAdjboeet;     
kísért AddAdjboeet;
kötéses AddAdjboeet;
közelítőleges AddAdjboeet;
lakhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
laposodott AddAdjboeot;
lazítós AddAdjboeet;
lokalizálhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
lopós AddAdjboeet;
lovagiatlanodott AddAdjboeot;
láthatatatlan AddAdjboeo;
lépős AddAdjboeet;     
magmatikusodott AddAdjboeot;
maradhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
maradásos AddAdjboeet;     
mert AddAdjboeet;
militárisodott AddAdjboeot;
moderálhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
mondós AddAdjboeet;     
mosdatott AddAdjboeot;
mozdítatlan AddAdjboeo;
muzeálisodott AddAdjboeot;
mángorlós AddAdjboeet;
mászhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
nedvdúsodott AddAdjboeot;
nyalós AddAdjboeet;
nyilatkozott AddAdjboeot;
nyilvántarthatatlan AddAdjboeo;
nyomatásos AddAdjboeet;
nyújtatlan AddAdjboeo;
nyújtott AddAdjboeot;
nyúlós AddAdjboeet;
oldódott AddAdjboeot;
oltatlan AddAdjboeo;
olvasós AddAdjboeet;     
osztatatlan AddAdjboeo;
osztatlanodott AddAdjboeot;
parlagiasodott AddAdjboeot;
pirítatlan AddAdjboeo;
pirított AddAdjboeot;
porlékonyodott AddAdjboeot;
prolongálhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
próbázott AddAdjboeot;
párlós AddAdjboeet;
párzott AddAdjboeot;
pörgős AddAdjboeet;
radírozhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
randevúzott AddAdjboeot;
rangsorolhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
rekonstruálhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
robajlott AddAdjboeot;
robbantós AddAdjboeet;
rontatlan AddAdjboeo;
rudazott AddAdjboeot;
rázós AddAdjboeet;     
sajátíthatatlan AddAdjboeo;
sakkozott AddAdjboeot;
sepert AddAdjboeet;
skalárisodott AddAdjboeot;
skatulyázhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
stacionáriusodott AddAdjboeot;
sugározhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
szabadulásos AddAdjboeet;     
szagolhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
szagosított AddAdjboeot;
szappanosíthatatlan AddAdjboeo;
szedős AddAdjboeet;
szekvenciálisodott AddAdjboeot;
szobázott AddAdjboeot;
szolgálhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
szorítós AddAdjboeet;     
szubsztanciálisodott AddAdjboeot;
szállítatlan AddAdjboeo;
számolós AddAdjboeet;     
számosodott AddAdjboeot;
szántatlan AddAdjboeo;
szédelgős AddAdjboeet;
szólásos AddAdjboeet;     
szólíthatatlan AddAdjboeo;
szórakoztatott AddAdjboeot;
szögelléses AddAdjboeet;
szűrt AddAdjboeet;
tagolós AddAdjboeet;
tanakszott AddAdjboeot;
tanulmányozhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
tanítós AddAdjboeet;
tartalmazhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
tartós AddAdjboeet;
tatárosodott AddAdjboeot;
telepakolhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
tisztíthatatlan AddAdjboeo;
toborzós AddAdjboeet;
toleránsodott AddAdjboeot;
továbbadhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
transzszexuálisodott AddAdjboeot;
tágítatlan AddAdjboeo;
tájékozatlanodott AddAdjboeot;
táncolhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
tárgyalós AddAdjboeet;
tárolhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
távolított AddAdjboeot;
tért AddAdjboeet;
történéses AddAdjboeet;
tűrt AddAdjboeet;
unhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
unszimpatikusodott AddAdjboeot;
utas  AddAdjboeet;
vallhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
varrt AddAdjboeet;
vastagodott AddAdjboeot;
vert AddAdjboeet;
vezetéses AddAdjboeet;     
villamosítatlan AddAdjboeo;
világítós AddAdjboeet;     
visszásodott AddAdjboeot;
vitázhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
vonásos AddAdjboeet;     
vágott AddAdjboeot;     
vágós AddAdjboeet;     
választatlan AddAdjboeo;
változtatatlan AddAdjboeo;
váltós AddAdjboeet;     
vásott AddAdjboeot;
vásárlós AddAdjboeet;
vételis AddAdjboeet;
zabálhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
zsírozott AddAdjboeot;
zárt AddAdjboeet;     
ábrázolhatatlan AddAdjboeo;
állatott AddAdjboeot;
állós AddAdjboeet;
általhathatatlan AddAdjboeo;
áztathatatlan AddAdjboeo;
éléses AddAdjboeet;     
írhatatlanodott AddAdjboeot;
öntéses AddAdjboeet;     
